North Dakota, session 69, SB2034.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 15-18.2-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If the number of credit-hours completed by an institution would cause a decrease in
the credit completion factor for that institution compared to the credit completion factor
the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19 bienniumreceived during the
prior biennium, the state board of higher education shall multiply the product
determined under section 15-18.2-02 by a credit growth factor of 1.0 for credits in
excess of the factor the institution was entitled to receive during the 2017-19
bienniumreceived during the prior biennium. Any weighted credit-hours multiplied by a
credit growth factor under this section must have a weight of 1.0 under section
15-18.2-02. The state board of higher education shall multiply the remaining weighted
credits by the credit completion factor the institution was entitled to receive during the
2017-19 bienniumreceived during the prior biennium.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE INTENT - WEIGHTED CREDIT-HOURS - INSTRUCTIONAL
PROGRAM CLASSIFICATION FACTORS. It is the intent of the sixty-ninth legislative assembly
that wind energy technology and law enforcement courses be transferred to the career and
technical education instructional program classification within the higher education funding
formula.
Page No. 1 25.0334.02000